Utah statutes.
59-10-544.   General powers and duties of the commission -- Deposit, distribution, or credit of revenues -- Refund reverts to state under certain circumstances.

(1) (a)  The commission shall administer and enforce a tax imposed under this chapter for which purpose it may divide the state into districts in each of which a branch office of the commission may be maintained.

(b)  A county may not be divided in forming a district.

(2) (a)  The commission shall daily deposit all revenue collected or received by the commission under this chapter with the state treasurer. 

(b)  Subject to Sections 59-10-529 and 59-10-531, the balance of the revenue described in Subsection (2)(a) shall be periodically distributed and credited to the Education Fund. 

(c)  If a refund the commission makes is not claimed within two years from the date the commission issues the refund:

(i)  the refund reverts to the state to be credited to the Education Fund; and

(ii)  no further claim may be made on the commission for the amount of the refund.



Amended by Chapter 212, 2009 General Session

